Hawaii, session 2026, HB1529.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 92-15, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§92-15[]]  Boards and commissions; quorum; number of votes necessary to validate acts. Whenever the number of members necessary to constitute a quorum to do business, or the number of members necessary to validate any act, of any board or commission of the State or of any political subdivision thereof, is not specified in the law or ordinance creating the same or in any other law or ordinance, a majority of all the current voting members [to which] of the board or commission [is entitled] shall constitute a quorum to do business, and the concurrence of a majority of [all] the members voting at a meeting for which a quorum is present [to which the board or commission is entitled] shall be necessary to make any action of the board or commission valid; provided that due notice shall have been given to all members of the board or commission or a bona fide attempt shall have been made to give the notice to all members to whom it was reasonably practicable to give the notice.  This section shall not invalidate any act of any board or commission performed prior to April 20, 1937, which, under the general law then in effect, would otherwise be valid." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________